Arkansas, session 2025, HB1979.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-93-106 is amended to read as follows:
16-93-106. Warrantless search by any law enforcement officer of
probationer, parolee, person placed on suspended imposition of sentence, or
person on post-release supervision.
(a)(1) A person who is placed on supervised probation or suspended
imposition of sentence or is released on parole or post-release supervision
under this chapter is required to agree to a waiver as a condition of his or
her supervised probation, suspended imposition of sentence, parole, or post-
release supervision that allows any certified law enforcement officer or
Division of Community Correction officer to conduct a warrantless search of
his or her person, place of residence, motor vehicle, or other real or
personal property, including without limitation a cellular or electronic
device under his or her control or possession, at any time, day or night,
*MBM224*
04/02/2025 5:37:11 PM MBM224

HB1979
whenever requested by the certified law enforcement officer or division
officer.
(2) A warrantless search that is based on a waiver required by
this section shall be conducted in a reasonable manner but does not need to
be based on an articulable suspicion that the person is committing or has
committed a criminal offense.
(b)(1) A person who will be placed on supervised probation, suspended
imposition of sentence, parole, or post-release supervision and is required
to agree to the waiver required by this section shall acknowledge and sign
the waiver.
(2) If the person fails to acknowledge and sign the waiver
required by this section, he or she is ineligible to be placed on supervised
probation, suspended imposition of sentence, parole, or post-release
supervision.
(c) As used in this section, “residence” includes a garage or
outbuilding on the property of a residence.




















04/02/2025 5:37:11 PM MBM224